Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.130

Weapons incidents—Reporting.

Each school district and each private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall report to the superintendent of public instruction by January 31st of each year all known incidents involving the possession of weapons on school premises, on transportation systems, or in areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools, in violation of RCW 9.41.280 in the year preceding the report. The superintendent shall compile the data and report it to the house of representatives, the senate, and the governor.

[ 1993 c 347 s 2.]